Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 1. State Sales Tax
§ 39-15-108.
Enforcement.

Audits. To assess credits and deficiencies against taxpayers and vendors, the department is authorized to rely on final audit findings made by the department of audit, taxpayer information, vendor information or department review subject to the following conditions:

Audits shall commence when the taxpayer or vendor receives written notice of the engagement of the audit. The issuance of the written notice of the audit shall toll the statute of limitations provided in W.S.

39-15-110

for the audit period specified in this subsection. The audit shall be completed by the department of audit with final findings issued to the taxpayer or vendor within one (1) year of the date of the notice of engagement. This time limit may be extended only upon mutual agreement between the taxpayer or vendor and the department;

After receiving notice of an audit under this subsection, the taxpayer or vendor shall preserve all records and books necessary to determine the amount of tax due for the time period that is being audited;

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, audits shall encompass a time period not to exceed three (3) years immediately preceding the reporting period when the audit is engaged. The three (3) year limit shall not apply to an audit if:

There is evidence of a violation of paragraph (c)(iv) or subsection (f) of this section by the taxpayer or vendor for the reporting period being audited; or

There is evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer or vendor in reporting or remitting taxes for the reporting period being audited.

If a taxpayer is not willing or able to produce adequate records to demonstrate taxes due, the department or the department of audit may project taxes based on the best information available. If a vendor is not willing or able to comply with the record requirements of paragraph (c)(xi) of this section, the department or the department of audit may project taxes based on the best information available;

Audits under this subsection are subject to the authority and procedures provided in W.S.

9-2-2003

.

Interest. The following shall apply:

If the amount of tax paid is less than the amount due, the difference together with interest thereon at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from the time the return was due shall be paid by the vendor or any person liable for the payment of the sales tax under this article within ten (10) days after notice and demand is made by the department. Effective July 1, 1994, interest at an annual rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined by the state treasurer during the preceding fiscal year plus four percent (4%) shall be added to the delinquent tax. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on delinquent taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year following the year in which the taxes first became delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent tax rate be greater than eighteen percent (18%) from any sale made on or after July 1, 1994. The interest rate on any delinquent tax from any sale made before July 1, 1994, shall be one percent (1%) per month from the date the return was due until paid;

If the sales or use tax on a vehicle, including local option sales or use tax, under W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-15-211

or

39-16-101

through

39-16-211

, is not paid within sixty-five (65) days after the date of the sale, or in the case of a motor vehicle brought into this state, sixty-five (65) days after the vehicle is brought into the state if the owner submits to the county treasurer an affidavit and any other satisfactory proof as necessary to verify the date the vehicle was brought into the state:

Interest shall accrue at the rate of one percent (1%) per month or fractional portion thereof from the sixty-fifth day after the date of sale until the date of payment of all sales tax interest and civil fees due. County treasurers shall collect interest due under this subsection which shall be forwarded to the department and credited to the state general fund;

A civil fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) from the sixty-fifth day through the seventy-fifth day after the date of sale shall also be assessed by the county treasurer under this paragraph. If all sales tax, interest and civil fees due are not paid by the seventy-fifth day, the civil fee shall be the twenty-five dollar ($25.00) amount or ten percent (10%) of the amount of tax due, whichever is greater, and shall be assessed by the county treasurer. Civil fees collected under this subparagraph shall be credited to the general fund of the county which makes the collection;

The tax is delinquent if the taxpayer or his agent knew or reasonably should have known that the tax liability was not paid within the sixty-five (65) day period.

The department may credit or waive interest imposed by this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

If any part of the deficiency is due to negligence or intentional disregard of rules and regulations but without intent to defraud there shall be added a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest as provided by paragraph (b)(i) of this section. The taxes, penalty and interest shall be paid by the vendor or any person liable for the payment of the sales tax under this article within ten (10) days after notice and demand is made by the department;

If any part of the deficiency is due to fraud with intent to evade there shall be added a penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest as provided by paragraph (b)(i) of this section. The taxes, penalty and interest shall be paid by the vendor or any person liable for the payment of the sales tax under this article within ten (10) days after notice and demand is made by the department;

No vendor shall advertise or state directly or indirectly to the public that the taxes imposed by this article shall be assumed by the vendor or that it will not be considered in the price, or if added, will be refunded;

Any vendor who under the pretense of collecting the taxes imposed by this article collects and retains an excessive amount or who intentionally fails to remit to the department the full amount of taxes when due is guilty of:

A misdemeanor if the amount of taxes collected is five hundred dollars ($500.00) or less punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or both; or

A felony if the amount of taxes collected exceeds five hundred dollars ($500.00) punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment for not to exceed three (3) years, or both.

Any person who violates W.S. 39-15-102(e) is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense;

Any person who files a false or fraudulent return is subject to the provisions of W.S.

6-5-303

;

Any person who violates any provision of this article for which there are no specific penalties is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each violation is a separate offense;

The department may, after providing two (2) written notices of intent to revoke identifying the reasons therefore, revoke the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article. The notices shall be provided at least one (1) week apart and the final notice shall be provided at least thirty (30) days prior to any revocation. The revocation of the department shall inform the vendor of all steps necessary to conform with the revocation and shall include the consequences of failure to cease business activities and the opportunity to appeal as provided in this subsection. The vendor may appeal a revocation under this paragraph to the state board of equalization not more than thirty (30) days following the revocation of the license. Appeals before the state board shall be conducted as contested case proceedings under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If a license is revoked under this subsection, no license shall thereafter be issued to that person until the applicant has:

Filed a new application with the department;

Filed with the department all past due returns and has remitted in full all taxes, penalties and interest due.

The department may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article until the time the vendor is in compliance;

Upon request of the department, the attorney general may institute proceedings to restrain and enjoin any person from:

Acting as a vendor until they have received a license as required by W.S. 39-15-106(a);

Continuing to act as a vendor if they have not remitted to the department, when due, all taxes, penalty and interest imposed by this article.

Every vendor shall preserve for three (3) years at his principal place of business, suitable records and books as may be necessary to determine the amount of tax for which he is liable under this article, together with all invoices and books showing all merchandise purchased for resale. All records, books and invoices shall be available for examination by the department during regular business hours except as arranged by mutual consent;

If a vendor fails to file a return as required by this article, the department shall give written notice by mail to the vendor to file a return on or before the last day of the month following the notice of delinquency. If a vendor then fails to file a return the department shall make a return from the best information available which will be prima facie correct and the tax due therein is a deficiency and subject to penalties and interest as provided by this article;

The department may impose a penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) upon any vendor who fails to file his return in a timely manner as required by W.S. 39-15-107(a) provided the vendor files his return within thirty (30) days of receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (xii) of this subsection. The department may impose a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon any vendor who fails to file his return within thirty (30) days of receiving notice from the department pursuant to paragraph (xii) of this subsection;

The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty imposed for failure to file a return provided that the taxpayer requests the waiver in writing within ninety (90) days after the due date, setting forth the reasons for the late filing;

The department may credit or waive penalties imposed by this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause;

Notwithstanding W.S. 39-15-102(e), if any vendor or taxpayer is one hundred fifty (150) days or more delinquent on taxes due under this article, has not entered into a formal payment arrangement with the department and after thirty (30) days notice provided by first class mail, the department shall post monthly the name of the vendor or taxpayer, the sales and use tax license number, physical address and the unpaid balance owed by the vendor or taxpayer on the website of the department indicating that the vendor or taxpayer has not paid the tax due under this article.

Liens. The following shall apply:

Any tax due under this article constitutes a debt to the state from the persons who are parties to the transaction, other than any vendor or other seller who is prohibited or not authorized by law to collect any tax under this article, and is a lien from the date the tax is due on all the real and personal property of those persons. The lien does not apply to purchasers who paid the tax to the vendor. Notice of the lien shall be filed with the county clerk of the county in which the persons who are parties to the transaction reside or in which the vendor conducts business. The lien does not have preference over preexisting indebtedness but shall have priority from and after the date of filing or recording. The department shall cancel lien statements within sixty (60) days after taxes due are paid or collected. No other action by the department is required to perfect a lien under this paragraph regardless of the type of property involved;

Except as provided by W.S. 39-15-107(b)(viii), no vendor shall collect taxes imposed by this article upon the sale of motor vehicles, house trailers, trailer coaches, trailers or semitrailers. The taxes imposed shall be collected by the county treasurer prior to the first registration in Wyoming and not upon subsequent registration by the same applicant. Upon a failure to pay the tax due upon any vehicle as provided by paragraph (b)(ii) of this section, the county treasurer shall notify the county clerk and the county clerk shall notify the department. The department may file a lien against the vehicle as provided by paragraph (i) of this subsection and shall note the lien on the title of the vehicle. After review by and approval of the board of county commissioners, the county may also collect the tax due and any interest, penalties or costs of collection through the use of a collection agency or by the filing of a civil action.

Tax sales. The following shall apply:

The tax due together with interest, penalties and costs may be collected by appropriate judicial proceedings or the department, with board approval, or its representative, may seize and sell at public auction so much of the person’s property as will pay all the tax, interest, penalties and costs. Notice of the auction must be published for four (4) weeks in a newspaper published in the resident county of the persons involved.

Automated sales suppression device. The following shall apply:

As used in this subsection:

“Automated sales suppression device” or “zapper” means a software program accessed by any means whatsoever which falsifies the electronic records of an electronic cash register or other point of sale system, including but not limited to transaction data and transaction reports;

“Electronic cash register” means a device which keeps a register or supporting documents through the means of an electronic device or computer system designed to record transaction data for the purpose of computing, compiling or processing related sales transaction data;

“Phantom-ware” means a hidden, preinstalled or installed at a later time, programming option embedded in the operating system of an electronic cash register or hardwired into the electronic cash register which can be used to create a virtual second till or may eliminate or manipulate transaction records which may or may not be preserved in a digital format to represent the true or manipulated record of transactions in the electronic cash register;

“Transaction data” means data associated with items purchased by a customer, the price for each item, a taxability determination for each item, a segregated tax amount for each of the taxed items, the amount of cash or credit tendered, the net amount returned to the customer in change, the date and time of the purchase, the name, address and identification number of the vendor, and the receipt or invoice number of the transaction;

“Transaction report” means a report documenting data, including but not limited to data associated with sales, taxes collected, media totals and discount voids at an electronic cash register which is printed on cash register tape at the end of a day or shift, or a report documenting every transaction at an electronic cash register which is stored electronically.

No person shall knowingly with the intent to evade the imposition, collection, reporting or remittance of sales tax sell, purchase, possess, install or transfer any automated sales suppression device, zapper or phantom-ware;

A violation of paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be a felony punishable by a fine up to five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment for not to exceed three (3) years, or both;

The offense created by this subsection shall be in addition to and considered a separate offense from any offense related to the nonpayment of taxes owed to the state or any political subdivision;

Any automated sales suppression device, zapper or phantom-ware or any device containing an automated sales suppression device, zapper or phantom-ware shall be considered contraband and shall be subject to seizure, confiscation and forfeiture.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 58, § 2; 2001, ch. 203, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 48, § 3; 2013 ch. 52, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2015 ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2015 ch. 140, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2013 amendment

added (f).

Laws 2013, ch. 52, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 15, 2013.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016, substituted “sixty (60) days” for “forty-five (45) days” in (b)(ii) and (b)(ii)(C).

The second 2015 amendment by ch. 140, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, added
(c)(xvi).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “sixty-fifth” for “fiftieth”
throughout (b)(ii)(A) and (b)(ii)(B), and substituted “seventy-fifth” for “sixtieth” twice in (b)(ii)(B).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (c)(vii), which read: “The department may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing revoke the license of any vendor violating any provision of this article and no license shall thereafter be issued to that person until the applicant has.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted former (a), which read: “Audits.
Except as otherwise provided, there are no specific applicable provisions for audits for this article” and added (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (e)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The Revisor’s Bill, Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “ Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Motor vehicle vendor liable for unpaid tax. —

This section creates a debt to the state from a motor vehicle vendor when the purchaser fails to pay the required sales tax. Rock Springs Ford Nissan v. State Bd. of Equalization, 890 P.2d 1100,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1995).

This section does not constitute general limitation statute

so as to prevent the board of equalization (now department) from assessing an additional sales tax for sales during a period which is more than three years prior to date of assessment. Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 288, 166 P.2d 960,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1946).

Quotation of overall price by retailer not improper. —

There is nothing in the wording of this section which indicates that it is improper for a retailer to quote an overall price. Thayer v. Smith, 357 P.2d 1115,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1960).

Interest and penalties. —

Department of revenue was not authorized to assess interest and penalties against purchasers for delinquent sales taxes. State v. Bannon Energy Corp., 999 P.2d 1306,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Computation of sales tax where property is turned in by purchaser, 4 ALR2d 1059.

Federal retail luxury or other excise tax as includable in amount on which the state sales tax is computed, 43 ALR2d 862.

Retailer's failure to pay to government sales or use tax funds as constituting larceny or embezzlement, 8 ALR4th 1068.

Retailer's or buyer's defenses against exaction of penalties for failure to file, or deficiency in, state or local sales tax return, 20 ALR4th 952.

§ 39-15-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this article.

Appeals. Except as provided by this subsection, no person who feels aggrieved by the payment of the taxes, penalty and interest imposed by this article may appeal a decision of the state board of equalization until all taxes, penalty and interest have been paid. For good cause shown, the court to which the decision of the board is appealed may stay enforcement of the board’s order assessing and levying the tax during the pendency of the appeal. The court’s stay of enforcement shall not affect the accruing of interest upon any assessment and levy.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

Any tax, penalty or interest which has been erroneously paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor shall either be credited against any subsequent tax liability of the vendor or refunded. If a vendor erroneously collects taxes from a taxpayer and remits those taxes to the department, the vendor may seek a refund or credit against subsequent tax liability only after the vendor has refunded the erroneously collected tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor. If the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor cannot be identified, the tax shall not be refunded or credited to the vendor. No credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the date of overpayment. The receipt of a claim for a refund by the department shall toll the statute of limitations. All refund requests received by the department shall be approved or denied within ninety (90) days of receipt. Any refund or credit erroneously made or allowed may be recovered in an action brought by the attorney general in any court of competent jurisdiction;

Any tax erroneously paid by a taxpayer shall be refunded by the vendor who originally collected the tax. No cause of action shall lie against the vendor by the taxpayer until not less than sixty (60) days elapse following a request by the taxpayer for a refund from the vendor.

Credits. The following shall apply:

Any tax, penalty or interest which has been erroneously paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor shall either be credited against any subsequent tax liability of the vendor or refunded. If a vendor erroneously collects taxes from a taxpayer and remits those taxes to the department, the vendor may seek a credit against subsequent tax liability or a refund only after the vendor has refunded the erroneously collected tax to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor. If the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor cannot be identified, the tax shall not be credited or refunded to the vendor. No credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the date of overpayment. The receipt of a claim for a refund by the department shall toll the statute of limitations. Any refund or credit erroneously made or allowed may be recovered in an action brought by the attorney general in any court of competent jurisdiction;

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 147, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 33, § 2.

The taxpayer or vendor is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid excise tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. This paragraph shall not apply to any tax which was erroneously collected from a taxpayer and remitted by a vendor unless the auditor can determine that the erroneously collected taxes have been refunded to the taxpayer that originally paid the tax to the vendor.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for escrow for this article.

If a mobile telecommunications service customer believes that the amount of tax, assessment or assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction included in the customer’s billing is erroneous, the customer shall notify the home service provider in writing. The written notification shall include the street address of the customer’s place of primary use, the account name and number, a description of the error claimed by the customer, and any other information which the home service provider reasonably requires to process the request. Within sixty (60) days of receiving a written notice under this subsection, the home service provider shall review its records to determine the customer’s taxing jurisdiction. If the review shows that the amount of tax, assessment or assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction is in error, the home service provider shall correct the error and refund or credit the amount of tax, charge or fee erroneously billed to the customer for a period of not to exceed three (3) years. If the review shows that the amount of tax, assessment and assignment of place of primary use or taxing jurisdiction are correct, the home service provider shall provide a written explanation to the customer. The procedures in this subsection shall be the first course of remedy available to a customer for a billing dispute, and no cause of action based upon the billing dispute shall accrue until the customer has reasonably exercised the rights and procedures set forth in this subsection.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 58, § 2; 2001, ch. 147, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 46, § 1; 2005, ch. 5, § 2; 2016 ch. 33, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

in (c), added (c)(ii), redesignating the existing provisions as (c)(i) and making related stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 5, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2005.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2016, in (c)(i) and (d)(i), substituted “paid, computed or remitted to the department by a vendor” for “paid, collected or computed” and added the second sentence; and in (d)(iv), inserted “or vendor” following “The taxpayer” and added the second sentence.

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 33, § 2, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (d)(iii), which read: “As soon as practicable after the return is filed the department shall examine it and if it appears the tax to be remitted is incorrect it shall be recomputed. If the amount paid exceeds that which is due the excess shall be refunded to the vendor or credited against any subsequent liability of the vendor.”

Amendment reducing time for filing claims given limited retrospective effect. —

The 1989 amendment, which reduced the time for filing refund claims from three years to one year (now 18 months), had retrospective effect only to the extent that any claim for credit or refund had to be filed within one year of the effective date of the amendment (February 22, 1989), so long as it was not barred by the prior statutory provisions. Meridian Aggregates Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 827 P.2d 375,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1992).

Section may not be enlarged by construction. —

The supreme court has not only adhered to the general rule against making taxes a lien except as expressly authorized by statute but has repeatedly said that statutes of the nature of this section may not be enlarged by construction. State Bd. of Equalization v. Courtesy Motors, 362 P.2d 134,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1961).

Weight entitled to administrative interpretation. —

Where several sessions of the legislature had passed in which no attempt was made to amend this article after interpretation had been placed upon it by administrative officers, their interpretation was entitled to weight by the court in construing the article. Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 288, 166 P.2d 960,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1946).

Affirmative act required by state to identify and protect lien. —

The word “imposition” formerly appearing in subsection (b) implied that some affirmative act is required by the state to identify and perfect its lien. Until the state takes some affirmative action to determine the deficiency and identify the extent of its lien, no one is placed on notice that there is a deficiency which may result in a lien being placed on the property. Wyoming Dep't of Revenue & Taxation-Excise Tax Div. v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A.-Kemmerer, 718 P.2d 31,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 540

(Wyo. 1986) (decided prior to second 1989 amendment).

Lien cannot antecede the date that the tax became due

even though there was a selling of the stock of merchandise or a quitting of business. State Bd. of Equalization v. Courtesy Motors, 362 P.2d 134,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1961).

Refund based on best information available. —

Although a taxpayer did not timely produce evidence to support a sales tax refund claim and should not, under case law interpreting former Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 39-1-302, 39-1-304(a), have been allowed to supplement the record on administrative appeal, the mandatory language of this section entitled the taxpayer to a refund based under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 39-15-107(a)(iv) on the best information available. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Qwest Corp., 2011 WY 146, 263 P.3d 622,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2011).

Refunds to vendor, rather than purchasers. —

Subsection (c) [of former § 39-6-410], both before and after the 1997 amendment, requires all erroneously collected sales tax to be refunded to the vendor, rather than the purchasers. State v. Buggy Bath Unlimited, Inc., 2001 WY 27, 18 P.3d 1182,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2001).

Business's erroneous collection of taxes from customers not subject to judicial review. —

A business erroneously collected sales tax from its customers and remitted the same to the state, and was assessed sales and use tax on materials consumed by it as a contractor. No payment was made on the assessment, but, instead, a hearing was held by the board on the business's contention that it was entitled to a credit for the sales tax it collected, with a subsequent appeal to the district court. The court was without subject matter jurisdiction for the following reasons: (1) the aggrieved party was statutorily required to pay all taxes prior to appealing the decision; and (2) the money collected from the customers belonged to third parties and could not qualify as payment of the business's taxes. M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

State Bd. of Equalization v. Jackson Hole Ski Corp., 737 P.2d 350,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Interest on tax refund or credit in absence of specific controlling statute, 88 ALR2d 823.

What constitutes payment for purposes of commencing limitations period under Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 6511(a)) for refund of tax overpayments, 160 ALR Fed 137.

§ 39-15-110.
Statute of limitations.

No credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the date of overpayment. The receipt of a claim for a refund by the department shall toll the statute of limitations.

The department may bring an action to recover any delinquent taxes, penalty or interest in any appropriate court within three (3) years following the delinquency. In the case of an assessment created by an audit, the delinquency period is deemed to start thirty (30) days after the date the assessment letter is sent. Any tax penalty and interest related to the audit assessment shall be calculated from the filing period during which the deficiency occurred. In any such action a certificate by the department is prima facie evidence of the amount due.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Cited

in

Qwest Corp. v. State, 2006 WY 35, 130 P.3d 507,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. Mar. 22, 2006).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Suspension of running of period of limitation, under 26 U.S.C. § 6503, for federal tax assessment or collection, 160 ALR Fed 1.

What constitutes payment for purposes of commencing limitations period under Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 6511(a)) for refund of tax overpayments, 160 ALR Fed 137.